California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
The fees which are collected by the Bureau of Livestock Identification pursuant to this article shall be forwarded to the director at the same time and in the same manner as the inspection fees which are provided for in Article 9 (commencing with Section 21281) of Chapter 6 of Division 10. The director shall reimburse, from any money which is collected pursuant to this section, the Bureau of Livestock Identification and any other bureaus or agencies of the state for any additional expenses which are incurred by them in the administration or enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 265, Sec. 13.   Effective July 11, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

64695.

Any person who is subject to the fee which is required by Section 64691 may obtain a refund of the fee collected from him by submitting to the director a claim for such refund. Such claim shall be submitted in writing within 90 days after the date of the brand inspection or the date of payment of the fee to the director whichever date is later. The claim for refund shall contain such necessary information as the director may require.

This section shall not become operative unless and until the promotion and research program is declared by the director to be voluntary pursuant to the provisions of Article 7 (commencing with Section 64671).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 418.)
-------------------------------------------

64696.

(a) All money that is collected by the director pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in any bank, or other depository that is approved by the Director of Finance, allocated to the purposes of this chapter only, and disbursed by the director or the council only for the necessary expenses that are incurred by the council and the director in carrying out the purposes and provisions of this chapter, including expenses generated by the auditing requirement contained in this section. Money that is so collected shall be deposited and disbursed in conformity with appropriate auditing regulations that are prescribed by the director. The expenditure of the money is exempt from the provisions of Sections 925.6 and 16304 of the Government Code.

(b) All expenditures by the council and the director shall be audited at least once every two years by one of the following means:

(1) By contract with a certified public accountant.

(2) By contract with a public accountant holding a valid permit issued by the California Board of Accountancy.

(3) By contract with a public accounting firm.

(4) By agreement with the Department of Finance.

A copy of the audit shall be delivered within 30 days after completion of the audit to the Governor, the director, and the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1055, Sec. 21.   Effective September 30, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

64697.

Money which is deposited pursuant to Section 64696 may be invested and reinvested by the Treasurer or the council in any of the securities described in Article 1 (commencing with Section 16430) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, or placed in a depository as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16500) of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and handled in the same manner as money in the State Treasury. For these purposes, the money may also be combined with funds which are determined by the director to be available for investment pursuant to Section 58939. Any increment which is received from investment, reinvestment, or deposit made by the Treasurer shall be remitted to the council. The Treasurer may deduct from the remittance an amount equal to the reasonable cost incurred in carrying out this section or may bill the council for the costs, and the council shall pay the costs from money which is collected for it pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 417, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

64698.

The director, after consultation with the council, shall prepare an annual budget which sets forth in reasonable detail the proposed expenditures which he deems necessary for the performance by him and by the department of the duties which are imposed upon them by this chapter. He shall also prepare and submit to the council an annual statement, in reasonable detail, of his expenditures pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

64699.

The director may receive funds in such amounts as he may deem necessary to defray the initial expenses in making effective this chapter. The director shall reimburse those persons from whom said funds are received in the amounts received from any funds which are received by the director pursuant to Section 64691.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

64700.

The director may accept contributions to advance the purposes of this chapter. If requested by the donor, such contributions shall be segregated and separately maintained for the use of the council.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

64701.

Any inspector who is described in Section 20010 may accept voluntary contributions on behalf of the director. Such contributions may be supplementary to collections which are provided in Article 8 (commencing with Section 64691) of this chapter. Such contributions may be in lieu of the fees specified in Article 8 (commencing with Section 64691) if the promotion and research program is declared by the director to be voluntary pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 64671).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 418.)
-------------------------------------------

64702.

The following shall apply to this chapter so long as the federal Beef Promotion and Research Act of 1985 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 2901 et seq.) and any resulting regulations are in effect. If the federal act is terminated by subsequent statute or in the manner specified in the act, this fact shall be certified by the secretary and this section shall be void and have no force and effect.

(a) A fee shall not be collected pursuant to this chapter on the sale of cattle or calves that originated from out of state and for which a federal assessment was paid in the originating state in accordance with the requirements of the federal act. When no federal assessment on the sale was paid in the originating state, the secretary shall ensure that any federal assessment due is paid. This subdivision shall not prevent the collection of fees by the secretary on subsequent sales of the cattle or calves.

(b) No fee shall be collected on the sale of cattle or calves if the sale is exempt from the federal act and regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

(c) (1) No person shall be liable for more than a total of one dollar ($1) per head per sale of cattle or calves under this chapter and the federal act.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to any fee increases approved by the secretary pursuant to Section 64691.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 291, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Termination [64731. - 64736.]

64731.

The provisions of this chapter shall continue to be operative permanently except as provided in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

64732.

A referendum among the state’s producers shall be conducted by the director in any of the following cases:

(a) Whenever the director, on his own motion or at the request of the council, determines that it is no longer in the best interest of the state to continue the existence of the council and the programs established and maintained pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Upon the receipt by the director of a petition for such a referendum signed by 3,000 of the state’s producers that signed the petition not more than six months prior to its presentation
 to the director.

In either such event, the director shall thereupon prepare and mail to each producer as shown in the records of the department, a ballot form and self-addressed envelope.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 418.)
-------------------------------------------

64733.

The ballot form shall be substantially as follows: 
BALLOT
California Beef Council Law
Termination of Council and Program

Shall the existence of the California Beef Council and the programs established and maintained under the California Beef Council Law (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 64501) of Division 22 of the Agricultural Code) be discontinued and terminated?YESNO
Signature of Producers

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

64734.

If upon the count of the ballots the director finds that 30 percent, or more, of all producers established by the director’s list have voted and that 51 percent, or more, of the total number of producers voting have assented to the discontinuance and termination of the council and the programs which are established and maintained pursuant to this chapter, the director shall make a finding to that effect and declare the existence of the council and the programs which are established and maintained pursuant to this chapter discontinued and terminated at the end of the fiscal year in which the referendum is conducted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

64735.

If upon a count of the ballots the director finds that less than 51 percent of the total number of producers voting have assented to such discontinuance and termination, he shall make a finding to that effect and the council and programs which are established and maintained pursuant to this chapter shall continue to remain in full force and effect.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

64736.

On the expiration of this chapter pursuant to this article, the council shall remain in existence for the purpose of furnishing the director with a complete record of its outstanding financial obligations, accrued and to accrue. The director shall pay from the money deposited and disbursed as provided in Section 64696 such obligations and any obligations incurred by the director and the department under the terms and provisions of this section. Any money which remains shall be retained by the director to defray the expenses of formulation, issuance, administration or enforcement of any subsequent program for beef promotion. If no such program is undertaken within a period of
 three years from the date of termination of this chapter, such money shall be withdrawn from the approved depository and paid into the State Treasury, allocated to the Department of Agriculture Fund for use by the director in carrying out the hide and brand provisions of this code, when appropriated by the Legislature.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. California Cattle Council Law [65001. - 65087.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [65001. - 65004.]

65001.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The production of cattle for both beef and dairy constitutes a paramount industry of this state that not only provides substantial revenues for the state but also provides willing consumers with local and nutritious food.

(b) The raising of beef and dairy cattle provides a viable living for many Californians and serves as the economic foundation for many rural communities. Cattle producers strive to be stewards of the resources they manage and the existence of ranching in California serves the public by providing numerous environmental and aesthetic benefits that would otherwise be lost without the use of California’s various range and pasture lands as working
 landscapes.

(c) Cattle production in California reflects a diverse set of family farmers and ranchers, including women- and minority-owned businesses, that provide a varied line of beef and dairy products through conventional, organic, grass-fed, kosher, halal, and other production methods that fill niche markets desired by willing consumers. Cattle producers vary in size from small to large based on the total number of animals raised and contribute equally to providing wholesome beef and dairy products to willing consumers.

(d) The stabilization, maintenance, and expansion of the cattle industry of California and the expansion of local, state, nationwide, and foreign markets for California beef and other products derived from the California cattle industry are necessary in order to provide willing consumers an adequate supply of high-quality California beef and dairy
 products.

(e) The council’s form of administration created by this chapter is uniquely situated to provide those engaged principally in the production of cattle, along with beef and other products derived from the California cattle industry, the opportunity to avail themselves of the benefits of collective action in advertising, promotion, food safety, production research, nutrition, marketing research, the collection and dissemination of production and related statistics, and public education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 127.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65002.

The purposes of this chapter are as follows:

(a) Most notably, to authorize and enable the secretary and the appointed governing body of the council to formulate and effectuate, directly or in cooperation with other agencies and parties, research relating to all types of California cattle production, including nonconventional and organic methods of production. Research may be focused on, but not limited to, improving the efficiency and sustainability of the California cattle industry, the development of management practices and assistance with compliance for rules and regulations that govern the production of cattle in California, the nutritional qualities of California beef and other products derived from the California cattle industry, public consumption
 patterns and trends, sales stimulation, and the development of consumer or other educational programs designed to increase the use and consumption of California beef and other products derived from the California cattle industry by willing consumers.

(b) To enable the California cattle industry to develop, maintain, and expand the local, state, nationwide, and foreign markets for all types, conventional and nonconventional, of California beef and other products derived from the California cattle industry.

(c) To enhance the California cattle and dairy industries, create a favorable environment for California cattle producers to operate, and improve the competitiveness of California cattle producers in both the national and international marketplace.

(d) To enable the council to present facts to local, state, federal,
 and foreign agencies on matters that affect the California cattle industry and the production of California beef and dairy cattle, beef, and other products derived from the California cattle industry.

(e) To provide funds for the administration and enforcement of this chapter by mandatory fees to be collected in the manner that is prescribed in this chapter, unless producers elect to receive a refund of those funds pursuant to Section 65075.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65003.

This chapter shall be liberally construed. If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65004.

It is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination that council members and alternates are intended to represent and further the interest of the particular industry concerned and that this representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that with respect to persons who are elected or appointed to the council, the particular industry concerned is tantamount to and constitutes the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [65011. - 65012.]

65011.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65012.

(a) “Beef” means the meat of cattle and includes veal.

(b) “Cattle” and “beef cattle” are synonymous and mean bovine animals of any breed, regardless of age.

(c) “Cattle feeder” means a producer raising cattle in confined spaces for the purposes of finishing cattle for market.

(d) “Council” means the California Cattle Council.

(e) “Department” means the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(f) “Ex officio member” means a nonvoting member of the council.

(g) “Handler” means a person engaged in the marketing of beef that the handler has produced, purchased, or acquired from a producer, or is marketed on behalf of a producer, whether as the owner, agent, employee, broker, or otherwise. 

(h) “Member” means any member of the council.

(i) “Other products derived from the California cattle industry” include, but are not limited to, those edible, industrial, and medicinal products produced in whole or in part from beef, dairy, or cattle.

(j) “Processor” means a person who harvests cattle or markets products derived from cattle to willing consumers, including beef, dairy products, or other products derived from the California cattle industry.

(k) “Producer” is a person who owns or acquires ownership of beef or dairy cattle, and who, upon request, provides proof of ownership of cattle or, for purposes of voting pursuant to this chapter, has owned beef or dairy cattle within the same calendar year as the vote occurs. A person is not a producer if the person’s only share in the proceeds of the sale of cattle or beef is a sales commission, handling fee, or other service fee.

(l) “Range cattle producer” means a person who owns and raises cattle primarily on range or pastureland for the purpose of producing beef and other products derived from the California cattle industry.

(m) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. California Cattle Council [65015. - 65029.]

65015.

There is in the state government the California Cattle Council that consists of 11 members and 11 alternates appointed by the secretary, each of whom shall be a producer in this state who is a range cattle producer, cattle feeder, dairy producer, or processor, with the exception of the public member who shall be a resident of this state. The secretary shall appoint members and alternates to the council to reflect the diversity of California’s cattle industry, including women- and minority-owned businesses, varying beef and dairy products, and cattle producers varying in size from small to large based on the total number of animals raised, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 65001.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65016.

The secretary or the secretary’s designee shall serve as an ex officio member.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65017.

(a) The secretary shall appoint to the council three range cattle producers, three cattle feeders, three dairy producers, one processor, and one public member to represent the general public.

(b) (1) Each member appointed as a range cattle producer, at the time of initial appointment, shall be a resident of a different county from the county in which any other range cattle producer members reside.

(2) Each member appointed as a dairy producer, at the time of initial appointment, shall be a resident of a different county from the county in which any other dairy producer members reside.

(c) The
 secretary shall use the same formula described in subdivisions (a) and (b) in the appointment of alternates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65018.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the public member and the public member’s alternate shall have all the powers, rights, and privileges of any other member or alternate, respectively, on the council, except that the public member or the public member’s alternate shall not have a vote on issues regarding the assessment established pursuant to Section 65071.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65019.

(a) The terms of office of the members and alternates of the council shall be three years. At the discretion of the secretary, the first appointments made under this chapter shall be so made that the terms of three members and the three members’ alternates shall expire at the end of one year, three members and the three members’ alternates shall expire at the end of two years, and three members and the three members’ alternates shall expire at the end of three years.

(b) Any vacancy that occurs during the unexpired term shall be filled by the secretary for the unexpired term from eligible nominees. No council member or alternate shall serve more than two consecutive three-year terms. Service as an alternate does not disqualify a person to
 then serve two terms as a member, and a member who was appointed for a one-year or two-year term may serve two additional three-year terms.

(c) If the secretary removes a member or alternate of the council, the vacancy shall be filled in the manner as provided in subdivision (a) for the duration of the unexpired term.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65020.

Six members of the council shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business, including the election of officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65021.

(a) The council shall annually select a chairperson and vice chairperson from its membership, to serve at the council’s pleasure, who, together with three other members selected annually by the council, shall constitute an executive committee.

(b) The executive committee shall have and exercise powers of the council as the council may delegate to it.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65022.

(a) The council shall have two regular meetings each year at times and places determined by the council.

(b) The times for regular meetings shall be fixed so that there is an interval of at least four months between each meeting.

(c) The council may hold additional meetings at any time and place at the call of the chairperson.

(d) The executive committee shall have two regular meetings each year and may hold additional meetings at any time and place at the call of the chairperson.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65023.

Members of the council shall be reimbursed for necessary traveling and other expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65024.

An alternate member of the council shall sit as a regular member of the council if the regular member fails for any reason to attend any meeting of the council. An alternate member shall be compensated and reimbursed in the same manner and to the same extent as a regular member when serving and has all the powers, duties, liabilities, and immunities of the member in whose place he or she is serving, except that the alternate to the chairperson or vice chairperson shall not succeed to the functions of these offices or sit as a regular member on the executive committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65025.

The secretary or the secretary’s representative shall be notified and may attend each meeting of the council.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65026.

No member or alternate of the council shall receive a salary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65027.

All funds received by any person from the assessments levied under this chapter or otherwise received by the council shall be deposited in banks designated by the council and shall be disbursed by order of the council through an agent or agents as it may designate for that purpose. A private agent or agents, other than the department, shall be bonded by a fidelity bond, executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in this state, in favor of the council, in an amount of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65028.

The state is not liable for the acts of the council or its contracts. Payments of all claims arising by reason of the administration of this chapter or acts of the council are limited to the funds collected by the council. No member or alternate of the council, or any employee or agent thereof, is personally liable for the contracts of the council. No member or alternate of the council, or any employee or agent thereof, is responsible individually in any way to any other person for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of council or omission, as principal, agent, or employee, except for his or her own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. No member or alternate of the council, or any employee or agent thereof, is responsible individually for any act or omission of any other member or alternate of the council, or
 any employee or agent thereof. No member or alternate of the council, or any employee or agent thereof, is liable for the default of any other member or alternate of the council, or any employee or agent thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65029.

The council may enter into contracts. Copies of its proceedings, records, and acts, when authenticated, shall be admissible in evidence in all courts of the state and shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of all statements therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties [65040. - 65058.]

65040.

The powers and duties of the council shall include, but are not limited to, all of those contained in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65041.

The council may adopt and from time to time alter, rescind, modify, and amend all proper and necessary bylaws, rules, and orders in accordance with council procedures for purposes of carrying out this chapter, including rules for appeals from any bylaw, rule, operating procedure, or order of the council. The council shall be charged with exercising any and all necessary duties to accomplish the objectives outlined in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65042.

If the council and the California Beef Council determine that a project is of mutual benefit and consistent with state and federal laws governing the California Beef Council, the project may be jointly funded by the council and the California Beef Council, subject to approval by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65043.

(a) The council may employ a person to serve at the pleasure of the council as the executive director of the council and other personnel. If any person employed by the council engages in any conduct that the secretary determines is not in the public interest or that is in violation of this chapter, the secretary shall notify the council of the conduct and request that corrective and, if appropriate, disciplinary action be taken by the council. If the council fails or refuses to correct the situation or to take disciplinary action satisfactory to the secretary, the secretary may suspend or discharge the person.

(b) The council may retain additional staff or agents of the council to discharge the duties outlined in this chapter.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 65002, a member, alternate member, agent, or employee of the council shall not do either of the following:

(1) Appear before any committee of the Legislature or federal government as a representative of the council unless requested to do so by that committee.

(2) Lobby in any manner as a representative of the council.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65044.

The council may appoint committees composed of members, alternates, and nonmembers not serving with the council in any official capacity to advise the council in carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65045.

The council shall approve reasonable compensation for the executive director and any agents or contractors of the council.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65046.

The council may establish offices and incur expenses, enter into any and all contracts and agreements, create liabilities, develop, own, and control the use of any intellectual or physical property, including real estate for the purpose of housing the operations of the council, and borrow funds in advance of receipt of assessments as may be necessary in the opinion of the council for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter and the performance of its duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65047.

The council shall keep books, records, and accounts of all its transactions, dealings, contracts, agreements, funds, and expenditures as it deems necessary. Those books, records, and accounts shall at all times be open to inspection and audit by the secretary. The council shall be subject to an annual audit by an auditing firm selected by the council with the concurrence of the secretary. The audit shall be made a part of an annual report to be posted on the council’s Internet Web site and submitted to the department. In addition, the secretary may determine it is necessary to conduct, or cause to be conducted, a fiscal and compliance audit of the council.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65048.

Funds collected pursuant to this chapter shall not be used for political contributions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65049.

The council may accept grants from state and federal entities to carry out the duties authorized by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65050.

The council may collect information about California beef and dairy production and publish and distribute, without charge, a bulletin or other communication to all eligible producers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65051.

(a) The council shall establish an annual budget according to generally accepted accounting practices. The council shall prepare annually summarized statements of the activities in which it has been engaged in the previous annual period, and of the activities in which it proposes to engage in the ensuing annual period. The annual budget and statements shall be made available to all eligible producers at their request and shall also be posted on the council’s public Internet Web site.

(b) Before the adoption of the annual budget, the council shall submit the proposed annual budget and its statement of contemplated activities to the secretary for the secretary’s concurrence.

(c) The annual budget and statement of contemplated activities shall be concurred in by the secretary before disbursement of funds, with the exception of expenditures made by the council pursuant to Section 65043.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65052.

When the secretary is required to concur in a decision of the council, the secretary shall give his or her response to the council within 15 working days from notification of the decision. The secretary shall set forth in writing with specificity the reasons for any refusal to concur. The secretary’s response may be a requirement that additional information be provided.
